Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 25. Ground Water Management Act of 1992.
§ 62.1-266.
Ground water withdrawal permits.

The Board may issue any ground water withdrawal permit upon terms, conditions, and limitations necessary for the protection of the public welfare, safety, and health.

Applications for ground water withdrawal permits shall be in a form prescribed by the Board and shall contain such information, consistent with this chapter, as the Board deems necessary.

All ground water withdrawal permits issued by the Board under this chapter shall have a fixed term not to exceed 15 years. The term of a ground water withdrawal permit issued by the Board shall not be extended by modification beyond the maximum duration, and the permit shall expire at the end of the term unless a complete application for a new permit has been filed in a timely manner as required by the regulations of the Board, and the Board is unable, through no fault of the permittee, to issue a new permit before the expiration date of the previous permit.

Renewed ground water withdrawal permits shall be for a withdrawal amount that includes such savings as can be demonstrated to have been achieved through water conservation, provided that a beneficial use of the permitted ground water can be demonstrated for the following permit term.

Any permit issued by the Board under this chapter may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, be amended or revoked on any of the following grounds or for good cause as may be provided by the regulations of the Board:

The permittee has violated any regulation or order of the Board pertaining to ground water, any condition of a ground water withdrawal permit, any provision of this chapter, or any order of a court, where such violation presents a hazard or potential hazard to human health or the environment or is representative of a pattern of serious or repeated violations that, in the opinion of the Board, demonstrates the permittee’s disregard for or inability to comply with applicable laws, regulations, or requirements;

The permittee has failed to disclose fully all relevant material facts or has misrepresented a material fact in applying for a permit, or in any other report or document required under this chapter or under the ground water withdrawal regulations of the Board;

The activity for which the permit was issued endangers human health or the environment and can be regulated to acceptable levels by amendment or revocation of the permit; or

There exists a material change in the basis on which the permit was issued that requires either a temporary or a permanent reduction or elimination of the withdrawal controlled by the permit necessary to protect human health or the environment.

No application for a ground water withdrawal permit shall be considered complete unless the applicant has provided the Executive Director of the Board with notification from the governing body of the locality in which the withdrawal is to occur that the location and operation of the withdrawing facility is in compliance with all ordinances adopted pursuant to Chapter 22 (§

15.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 15.2. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any applicant exempt from compliance under Chapter 22 (§

15.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

A ground water withdrawal permit shall authorize withdrawal of a specific amount of ground water through a single well or system of wells, including a backup well or wells, or such other means as the withdrawer specifies.

The Board may adopt regulations to develop a general permit for the regulation of irrigation withdrawals from the surficial aquifer greater than 300,000 gallons in any one month. Regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection shall provide that withdrawals from the surficial aquifer may be permitted under either a general permit developed pursuant to this subsection or another ground water withdrawal permit.

The Board shall promulgate regulations establishing criteria for determining whether the quantity or quality of the ground water in a surficial aquifer is adequate to meet a proposed beneficial use. Such regulations shall specify the information required to be submitted to the Department by a golf course or any other person seeking a determination from the Department that either the quantity or quality of the ground water in a surficial aquifer is not adequate to meet a proposed beneficial use. Such regulations shall require the Department, within 30 days of receipt of a complete request, to make a determination as to the adequacy of the quantity or quality of the ground water in a surficial aquifer.

History.

1992, c. 812; 2018, c. 424; 2020, c. 670.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 670, cl. 2 was codified as subsection I of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 424, in subsection C, substituted “15 years” for “ten years” in the first sentence and deleted the former third sentence, which read “Any permit to withdraw ground water issued by the Board on or after July 1, 1991, and prior to July 1, 1992, shall expire ten years after the date of its issuance”; in subsection F, substituted “locality” for “county, city or town”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 670 added subsection H.

§ 62.1-267.
Issuance of special exceptions.

The Board may issue a special exception to allow the withdrawal of ground water in the case of an unusual situation in which requiring the user to obtain a ground water withdrawal permit would be contrary to the intended purpose of the Act.

In reviewing an application for a special exception, the Board may consider the amount and duration of the proposed withdrawal, the beneficial use intended for the ground water, the return of the ground water to the aquifer, and the effect of the withdrawal on human health and the environment. Any person requesting a special exception shall submit an application to the Board containing such information as the Board shall require by regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter.

Any special exception issued by the Board shall state the terms pursuant to which the applicant may withdraw ground water, including the amount of ground water that may be withdrawn in any period and the duration of the special exception. No special exception shall be issued for a term exceeding 15 years.

A violation of any term or provision of a special exception shall subject the holder thereof to the same penalties and enforcement procedures as would apply to a violation of a ground water withdrawal permit.

The Board shall have the power to amend or revoke any special exception after notice and opportunity for hearing on the grounds set forth in subsection D of §

62.1-266

for amendment or revocation of a ground water withdrawal permit.

History.

1992, c. 812; 2018, c. 424.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 424, in subsection A, substituted “a special exception to allow the withdrawal of ground water in the case of an unusual situation in which” for “special exceptions to allow the withdrawal of ground water in cases of unusual situations where”; and in subsection C, substituted “15 years” for “ten years” at the end.

§ 62.1-268.
Issuance of special orders.

The Board may issue special orders (i) requiring any person who has violated the terms and provisions of a ground water withdrawal permit issued by the Board to comply with such terms and provisions; (ii) requiring any person who has failed to comply with a directive from the Board to comply with such directive; or (iii) requiring any person who has failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter or any decision of the Board pertaining to ground water to comply with such provision or decision.

Such special orders are to be issued only after a hearing with at least thirty days’ notice to the affected person of the time, place and purpose thereof, and they shall become effective not less than fifteen days after service by certified mail, sent to the last known address of such person, with the time limits counted from the date of such mailing; however, if the Board finds that any such person is grossly affecting or presents an imminent and substantial danger to (i) the public welfare, safety or health; (ii) a public water supply; or (iii) commercial, industrial, agricultural or other beneficial uses, it may issue, without advance notice or hearing, an emergency special order directing the person to cease such withdrawal immediately and shall provide an opportunity for a hearing, after reasonable notice as to the time and place thereof to the person, to affirm, modify, amend or cancel such emergency special order. If a person who has been issued such a special order or an emergency special order is not complying with the terms thereof, the Board may proceed in accordance with §

62.1-269

, and where the order is based on a finding of an imminent and substantial danger, the court shall issue an injunction compelling compliance with the emergency special order pending a hearing by the Board. If an emergency special order requires cessation of a withdrawal, the Board shall provide an opportunity for a hearing within forty-eight hours of the issuance of the injunction.

The provisions of this section notwithstanding, the Board may proceed directly under §

62.1-270

for any past violation or violations of any provision of this chapter or any regulation duly promulgated hereunder.

With the consent of any person who has violated or failed, neglected or refused to obey any regulation or order of the Board pertaining to ground water, any condition of a ground water withdrawal permit or any provision of this chapter, the Board may provide, in an order issued by the Board against such person, for the payment of civil charges for past violations in specific sums not to exceed the limit specified in §

62.1-270

. Such civil charges shall be instead of any appropriate civil penalty which could be imposed under subsection A of §

62.1-270

and shall not be subject to the provisions of §

2.2-514

.

History.

1992, c. 812.

§ 62.1-269.
Enforcement by injunction, etc.

Any person violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any rule, regulation, order, standard or requirement of the Board pertaining to ground water, any provision of any ground water withdrawal permit issued by the Board, or any provision of this chapter may be compelled to obey same and to comply therewith in a proceeding instituted by the Board in any appropriate court for injunction, mandamus or other appropriate remedy.
The Board shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs in any action brought by the Board under this section in which it substantially prevails on the merits of the case, unless special circumstances would make an award unjust.

History.

1992, c. 812.

§ 62.1-270.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or who fails, neglects or refuses to comply with any order of the Board pertaining to ground water, or order of a court, issued as herein provided, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 for each violation within the discretion of the court. Each day of violation of each requirement shall constitute a separate offense.Such civil penalties may, in the discretion of the court assessing them, be directed to be paid into the treasury of the county, city, or town in which the violation occurred to be used for the purpose of abating environmental pollution therein in such manner as the court may, by order, direct, except that where the person in violation is such county, city or town itself, or its agent, the court shall direct such penalty to be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 of Title 10.1.With the consent of any person in violation of this chapter, the Board may provide, in an order issued by the Board against the person, for the payment of civil charges. These charges shall be in lieu of the civil penalties referred to above. Such civil charges shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund.

Any person willfully or negligently violating any provision of this chapter, any regulation or order of the Board pertaining to ground water, any condition of a ground water withdrawal permit or any order of a court shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by confinement in jail for not more than twelve months and a fine of not less than $2,500 nor more than $25,000, either or both. Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter, any regulation or order of the Board pertaining to ground water, any condition of a ground water withdrawal permit or any order of a court issued as herein provided, or who knowingly makes any false statement in any form required to be submitted under this chapter shall be guilty of a felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than one year nor more than three years, or in the discretion of the jury or the court trying the case without a jury, confinement in jail for not more than twelve months and a fine of not less than $5,000 nor more than $50,000 for each violation. Any defendant that is not an individual shall, upon conviction of a violation under this subsection, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $10,000. Each day of violation of each requirement shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter, and who knows at that time that he thereby places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily harm, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than two years nor more than fifteen years and a fine of not more than $250,000, either or both. A defendant that is not an individual shall, upon conviction of a violation under this subsection, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding the greater of one million dollars or an amount that is three times the economic benefit realized by the defendant as a result of the offense. The maximum penalty shall be doubled with respect to both fine and imprisonment for any subsequent conviction of the same person under this subsection.

Criminal prosecution under this section shall be commenced within three years of discovery of the offense, notwithstanding the limitations provided in any other statute.

History.

1992, c. 812.

Cross references.

For the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund, see § 10.1-2500.